Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.715

Board of trustees—Created—Selection of trustees—Terms of office—Vacancies.

(1) An eleven member board of trustees is hereby created.

(a) Before January 1, 2007, three of the board members shall be active law enforcement officers who are participants in the plan. Beginning with the first vacancy on or after January 1, 2007, two board members shall be active law enforcement officers who are participants in the plan and one board member shall be either an active or a retired law enforcement officer who is a participant of the plan. The law enforcement officer board members shall be appointed by the governor from a list provided by a recognized statewide council whose membership consists exclusively of guilds, associations, and unions representing state and local government police officers, deputies, and sheriffs and excludes federal law enforcement officers.

(b) Before January 1, 2007, three of the board members shall be active firefighters who are participants in the plan. Beginning with the first vacancy on or after January 1, 2007, two board members shall be active firefighters who are participants in the plan and one board member shall be either an active or a retired firefighter who is a participant of the plan. The firefighter board members shall be appointed by the governor from a list provided by a recognized statewide council, affiliated with an international association representing the interests of firefighters.

(c) Three of the board members shall be representatives of employers and shall be appointed by the governor.

(d) One board member shall be a member of the house of representatives who is appointed by the governor based on the recommendation of the speaker of the house of representatives.

(e) One board member shall be a member of the senate who is appointed by the governor based on the recommendation of the majority leader of the senate.

(f) After January 1, 2008, at least one board member must be a retired participant of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. This member may be appointed under (a) through (e) of this subsection.

(2) The initial law enforcement officer and firefighter board members shall serve terms of six, four, and two years, respectively. Thereafter, law enforcement officer and firefighter board members serve terms of six years. The initial employer representative board members shall serve terms of four, five, and six years, respectively. Thereafter, employer representative board members serve terms of four years. The initial legislative board members shall serve terms of five years and six months. Thereafter, legislative board members serve terms of two years, which begin on January 1st of odd-numbered years. Board members may be reappointed to succeeding terms without limitation. Board members shall serve until their successors are appointed and seated.

(3) In the event of a vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as prescribed for an initial appointment.

[ 2007 c 303 s 1; 2003 c 2 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 790, approved November 5, 2002).]